Missouri, session 2026, SB1167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 579, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 579.017, to read as
follows:
579.017. 1. (1) A person commits the offense of
possession of an abortifacient drug if he or she knowingly
possesses an abortifacient drug, including, but not limited
to, mifepristone (RU-486) or any other drug used alone or in
combination with another to induce an abortion, with the
intent to induce an abortion on themselves or another person.
(2) The offense of possession of an abortifacient drug
is a class C felony.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense for any person
to allege to have violated this subsection that the person
knowingly possessed the abortifacient drug to induce an
abortion because of a medical emergency, as such term is
defined in section 188.015.
2. (1) A person commits the offense of delivery of an
abortifacient drug if he or she knowingly distributes or
delivers, attempts to distribute or deliver, or knowingly
possesses with an intent to distribute or deliver, an

SB 1167 2
abortifacient drug, including, but not limited to,
mifepristone (RU-486) or any other drug used alone or in
combination with another to induce an abortion, with the
intent to induce, or otherwise assist in inducing, an
abortion on another person.
(2) The offense of delivery of an abortifacient drug
is a class C felony.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense for any person
to allege to have violated this subsection that the person
knowingly distributed or delivered the abortifacient drug to
induce an abortion because of a medical emergency, as such
term is defined in section 188.015.
✓